



William W Harvey in San Diego, CA 92110 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» California
» San Diego
» Cleanup Services
» William W Harvey













William W Harvey


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





3999 Old Town Ave Apt J1  San Diego, California 92110


(619) 297-1636


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
William W Harvey is located at the address 3999 Old Town Ave Apt J1 in San Diego, California 92110.  They can be contacted via phone at (619) 297-1636 for pricing, hours and directions.  William W Harvey specializes in Asbestos, Flood, Pet Odors.  William W Harvey has an annual sales volume of 501K - 999,999.  .William W Harvey provides Indoor Cleaning, Treatments, Pick Ups to it's customers.  For maps and directions to William W Harvey view the map to the right.  For reviews of William W Harvey see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Delicate Fabrics
, Air Movers
, Dump Trucks
, Cans
, Dehumidifiers
, Trailers
, Containers
, Truck Mount Units
, Storage
, Drying Equipment



SERVICES


Treatments & Applications
, Sealing
, Drapery Cleaning
, Treatments
, Commercial Projects
, Floor Work
, Long Distance Moves
, Pick Ups
, Sewer Systems
, Indoor Cleaning


 BRANDS


Lysol
, Thermax
, RX20
, Prochem
, FourGuard
, Topsinol
, Hoover
, 3M
, Bridgepoint
, Sanitaire


 SPECIALTIES


Freezers
, Drapes
, Asbestos
, Grease Stains
, Sewage Damage
, Flood
, Pet Odors
, Furnishings
, Carpets
, Urine Stains



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (619) 297-1636
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 1 To 4
Exact Employee Count: 1
Exact Sales Volume: 30000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 501K - 999,999
CATEGORIES:


Cleanup Services
Consulting Services
Research & Development Services
Professional Services
Waste Management & Cleanup Services



People Also Viewed


2connect


5752 Oberlin Dr Ste 106 Ste 106 San Diego, California 92121




Utilicomm Consultants


5223 E Falls View Dr  San Diego, California 92115




Bcw Enterprizes Culture Kits


937 Moana Dr  San Diego, California 92106




Waste Management-orange County


11545 W Bernardo Ct  San Diego, California 92127




City Of San Diego


1010 2nd Ave  San Diego, California 92101




Marine Spill Response Corp


1861 Main St  San Diego, California 92113





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM












William W Harvey                                                                                                         - Spencer                                           , IN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IN



Spencer



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            William W Harvey
                                    



 





















W 


William W Harvey                                                                                                        
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



5288 BRAYSVILLE RD SPENCER, IN 47460
Get Directions



(812) 876-4257
 





Business Info



 Founded 2011
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $63,616.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts William W Harvey                                                                                                        







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2011 the company has been providing Business Services At Non-commercial Site. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







W

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

























 





William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









William Harvey - Wikipedia






















 







William Harvey

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia

This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 3 July 2017.




					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other people named William Harvey, see William Harvey (disambiguation).
"De Generatione" redirects here. For Aristotle's book of that name, see Generation of Animals.


William Harvey



William Harvey



Born
(1578-04-01)1 April 1578
Folkestone, Kent, England


Died
3 June 1657(1657-06-03) (aged 79)
Roehampton, London, England


Nationality
English


Fields
Medicine
Anatomy


Alma mater
Gonville and Caius College, Cambridge
University of Padua


Doctoral advisor
Hieronymus Fabricius


Known for
De Motu Cordis (on Circulation of the blood)


Influenced
René Descartes[1]


Signature




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely and in detail the systemic circulation and properties of blood being pumped to the brain and body by the heart, though earlier writers, such as Realdo Colombo, Michael Servetus, and Jacques Dubois, had provided precursors of the theory.[2][3] In 1973 the William Harvey Hospital was constructed in the town of Ashford, a few miles from his birthplace of Folkestone.



Contents


1 Family
2 Biography

2.1 Early life and the University of Padua
2.2 The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital
2.3 Lumleian Lecturer
2.4 Physician to James I
2.5 Witchcraft trials
2.6 Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War
2.7 Harvey's later years, death and burial


3 De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)
4 Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey
5 On Animal Generation
6 Legacy
7 Personality
8 Gallery
9 Works
10 See also
11 References
12 Further reading
13 External links



Family[edit]
William's father, Thomas Harvey, was a jurat of Folkestone where he served the office of mayor in 1600. Records and personal descriptions delineate him as an overall calm, diligent, and intelligent man whose "sons... revered, consulted and implicitly trusted in him... (they) made their father the treasurer of their wealth when they acquired great estates...(He) kept, employed, and improved their gainings to their great advantage."[4] Thomas Harvey's portrait can still be seen in the central panel of a wall of the dining-room at Rolls Park, Chigwell, in Essex. William was the eldest of nine children, seven sons and two daughters, of Thomas and his wife Joan Halke. Notable family connections include Heneage Finch, 1st Earl of Nottingham, who married William's niece Elizabeth Harvey, and the diplomat Sir Daniel Harvey.[citation needed]
Biography[edit]
Early life and the University of Padua[edit]
Harvey's initial education was carried out in Folkestone, where he learned Latin. He then entered the King's School (Canterbury). Harvey stayed at the King's School for five years, after which he matriculated at Gonville and Caius College in Cambridge in 1593.
Harvey graduated as a Bachelor of Arts from Caius in 1597.[5] He then travelled through France and Germany to Italy, where he entered the University of Padua, in 1599.
During Harvey's years of study there, he developed a relationship with Fabricius and read Fabricius's De Venarum Ostiolis.
Harvey graduated as a Doctor of Medicine at the age of 24 from the University of Padua on 25 April 1602. It reports that Harvey had

"conducted himself so wonderfully well in the examination and had shown such skill, memory and learning that he had far surpassed even the great hopes which his examiners had formed of him."[6]

The College of Physicians, marriage and Saint Bartholomew's Hospital[edit]
After graduating from Padua, Harvey immediately returned to England where he obtained the degree of Doctor of Medicine from the University of Cambridge that same year, and became a fellow of Gonville and Caius College. Following this, Harvey established himself in London, joining the Royal College of Physicians on 5 October 1604.
A few weeks after his admission, Harvey married Elizabeth Browne, "daughter of Lancelot Browne Dr. Physic".[7] They had no children.
Harvey was elected a Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians on 5 June 1607, which earned him the Post-nominal letters FRCP, and he then accepted a position at St Bartholomew's Hospital that he was to occupy for almost all the rest of his life. Succeeding a Dr Wilkinson on 14 October 1609, he became the Physician in charge at St Bartholomew's Hospital, which enjoined him, "in God's most holy name" to "endeavor yourself to do the best of your knowledge in the profession of physic to the poor then present, or any other of the poor at any time of the week which shall be sent home unto you by the Hospitaller... You shall not, for favor, lucre or gain, appoint or write anything for the poor but such good and wholesome things as you shall think with your best advice will do the poor good, without any affection or respect to be had to the apothecary. And you shall take no gift or reward... for your counsel... This you will promise to do as you shall answer before God... "[8]
Harvey earned around thirty-three pounds a year and lived in a small house in Ludgate, although two houses in West Smithfield were attached as fringe benefits to the post of Physician. At this point, the physician's function consisted of a simple but thorough analysis of patients who were brought to the hospital once a week and the consequent writing of prescriptions.
Lumleian Lecturer[edit]
The next important phase of Harvey's life began with his appointment to the office of Lumleian lecturer on 4 August 1615. The Lumleian lectureship, founded by Lord Lumley and a Dr. Richard Caldwell in 1582, consisted in pronouncing lectures for a period of seven years, with the purpose of "spreading light" and increasing the general knowledge of anatomy throughout England.
Harvey began his lectures in April 1616. At this time, at the age of thirty-seven, he was described as "a man of lowest stature, round faced; his eyes small, round, very black and full of spirit; his hair as black as a raven and curling".[9] The notes which he used at the time are preserved in the British Museum.
At the beginning of his lectures, Harvey laid down the canons for his guidance:

"To show as much as may be at a glance, the whole belly for instance, and afterwards to subdivide the parts according to their positions and relations.
To point out what is peculiar to the actual body which is being dissected.
To supply only by speech what cannot be shown on your own credit and by authority.
To cut up as much as may be in the sight of the audience.
To enforce the right opinion by remarks drawn far and near, and to illustrate man by the structure of animals.
Not to praise or dispraise other anatomists, for all did well, and there was some excuse even for those who are in error.
Not to dispute with others, or attempt to confute them, except by the most obvious retort.
To state things briefly and plainly, yet not letting anything pass unmentioned which can be seen.
Not to speak of anything which can be as well explained without the body or can be read at home.
Not to enter into too much detail, or in too minute dissection, for the time does not permit.
To serve three courses according to the glass [i.e. allot a definite time to each part of the body]. In the first day's lectures the abdomen, nasty yet recompensed by its infinite variety. In the second the parlour, [i.e. the thorax?]. In the third day's lecture the divine banquet of the brain."[10]

Physician to James I[edit]
Harvey continued to participate in the Lumleian lectures while also taking care of his patients at St Bartholomew's Hospital; he thus soon attained an important and fairly lucrative practice, which climaxed with his appointment as 'Physician Extraordinary' to King James I on 3 February 1618. He seems to have similarly served various aristocrats, including Lord Chancellor Bacon.[11][12] Bacon entirely failed to impress the more practical minded Harvey, who refused to regard him as a great philosopher. He said of him "He writes philosophy like a Lord Chancellor."[13]
In 1628 he published in Frankfurt his completed treatise on the circulation of the blood, the De Motu Cordis. As a result of negative comments by other physicians Harvey "fell mightily in his practice",[14] but continued advancing his career. He was re-elected 'Censor' of the College of Physicians in 1629, having been elected for the first time in 1613 and the second time in 1625. Eventually, Harvey was also elected Treasurer of the College.
Witchcraft trials[edit]
Harvey was a prominent sceptic regarding allegations of witchcraft. He was one of the examiners of four women from Lancashire accused of witchcraft in 1634, and as a consequence of his report, all of them were acquitted.[15][16] Earlier, in 1632, while travelling with the King to Newmarket, he had been sent to investigate a woman accused of being a witch. Initially he told her that he was a wizard and had come to discuss the Craft with her, and asked whether she had a familiar. She put down a saucer of milk and called to a toad which came out and drank the milk. He then sent her out to fetch some ale, and killed the toad and dissected it, concluding that it was a perfectly ordinary animal and not supernatural in any way. When the woman returned she was naturally very angry and upset, but Harvey eventually silenced her by stating that he was the King's Physician, sent to discover whether she were a witch, and if she were, to have her apprehended.[17]
Excursions abroad, election as physician to Charles I and the English Civil War[edit]
At the age of fifty-two, Harvey received commands by the king to accompany the Duke of Lennox during his trip abroad. This voyage – the first after his return from Padua – lasted three years, taking Harvey through the countries of France and Spain during the Mantuan War and Plague. During this journey he wrote to Viscount Dorchester:

"I can complain that by the way we could scarce see a dog, crow, kite, raven or any other bird, or anything to anatomize, only some few miserable people, the relics of the war and the plague where famine had made anatomies before I came. It is scarce credible in so rich, populous, and plentiful countries as these were that so much misery and desolation, poverty and famine should in so short a time be, as we have seen. I interpret it well that it will be a great motive for all here to have and procure assurance of settled peace. It is time to leave fighting when there is nothing to eat, nothing to be kept, and nothing to be gotten".[18]

Having returned to England in 1632, Harvey accompanied King Charles I wherever he went as 'Physician in Ordinary'. In particular, Charles's hunting expeditions gave Harvey access to many deer carcasses; it was upon them that Harvey made many observations and consequent theories. Harvey returned to Italy in 1636, dining at the English College, Rome, as a guest of the Jesuits there, in October 1636. It is possible he met Galileo in Florence en route.[19]
During the English Civil War a mob of citizen-soldiers against the King entered Harvey's lodgings, stole his goods, and scattered his papers. The papers consisted of "the records of a large number of dissections ... of diseased bodies, with this observations on the development on insects, and a series of notes on comparative anatomy."[20] During this period, Harvey maintained his position, helped the wounded on several occasions and protected the King's children during the Battle of Edgehill.
The conflicts of the Civil War soon led King Charles to Oxford, with Harvey attending, where the physician was made "Doctor of Physic" in 1642 and later Warden of Merton College in 1645. "In Oxford he (Harvey) very soon settled down to his accustomed pursuits, unmindful of the clatter of arms and of the constant marching and countermarching around him, for the city remained the base of operations until its surrender... "[21]
Harvey's later years, death and burial[edit]
The surrender of Oxford in 1645 marks the beginning of Harvey's gradual retirement from public life and duties. Now sixty-eight years old and childless, Harvey had lost three brothers and his wife by this time. He thus decided to return to London, and lived with his brothers Eliab and Daniel at different periods. Having retired from St Bartholomew's Hospital and his various other aforementioned positions, he passed most of this time reading general literature. Several attempts to bring Harvey back into the 'working world' were made, however; here is an excerpt of one of Harvey's answers:

"Would you be the man who should recommend me to quit the peaceful haven where I now pass my life and launch again upon the faithless sea? You know full well what a storm my former lucubrations raised. Much better is it oftentimes to grow wise at home and in private, than by publishing what you have amassed with infinite labour, to stir up tempests that may rob you of peace and quiet for the rest of your days."[22]

Harvey died at Roehampton in the house of his brother Eliab on 3 June 1657. Descriptions of the event seem to show that he died of a cerebral hemorrhage from vessels long injured by gout: it is highly probable that the left middle cerebral artery malfunctioned, leading to a gradual accumulation of blood to the brain which eventually overwhelmed it. There exists a fairly detailed account of what happened on that day; according to the information at hand, Harvey:

"went to speak and found that he had the dead palsy in his tongue; then he saw what was to become of him. He knew there were then no hopes of his recovery, so presently he sends for his young nephews to come up to him. He then made signs (for seized with the dead palsy in his tongue he could not speak) to let him blood his tongue, which did him little or no good, and so ended his days, dying in the evening of the day on which he was stricken, the palsy giving him an easy passport."[23]

His will distributed his material goods and wealth throughout his extended family and also left a substantial amount of money to the Royal College of Physicians.
Harvey was buried in Hempstead, Essex. The funeral procession started on 26 June 1657, leading Harvey to be placed in the 'Harvey Chapel' built by Eliab. The conditions of Harvey's burial are also known: "Harvey was laid in the chapel between the bodies of his two nieces, and like them he was lapt in lead, coffin less".[24] On St. Luke's Day, 18 October 1883, Harvey's remains were reinterred, the leaden case carried from the vault by eight Fellows of the College of Physicians, and deposited in a sarcophagus containing his works and an inscription:

"The body of William Harvey lapt in lead, simply soldered, was laid without shell or enclosure of any kind in the Harvey vault of this Church of Hempstead, Essex, in June 1657. In the course of time the lead enclosing the remains was, from expose and natural decay, so seriously damaged as to endanger its preservation, rendering some repair of it the duty of those interested in the memory of the illustrious discoverer of the circulation of the Blood. The Royal College of Physicians, of which corporate body Harvey was a munificent Benefactor did in the years 1882–1883, by permission of the Representatives of the Harvey family, undertake this duty. In accordance with this determination the leaden mortuary chest containing the remains of Harvey was repaired, and was, as far as possible, restored to its original state... "[25]

De Motu Cordis (On the Motion of the Heart and Blood)[edit]
Main article: Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus




An experiment from Harvey's de Motu Cordis


Published in 1628 in the city of Frankfurt (host to an annual book fair that Harvey knew would allow immediate dispersion of his work), the 72 page Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus contains the matured account of the circulation of the blood. Opening with a dedication to King Charles I, the quarto has 17 chapters which give a perfectly clear and connected account of the action of the heart and the consequent movement of the blood around the body in a circuit. Having only a tiny lens at his disposal, Harvey was not able to reach the adequate pictures that were attained through such microscopes used by Leeuwenhoek; thus he had to resort to theory – and not practical evidence – in certain parts of his book. After the first chapter, which simply outlines past ideas and accepted rules regarding the heart and lungs, Harvey moves on to a fundamental premise to his treatise, stating that it was extremely important to study the heart when it was active in order to truly comprehend its true movement; a task which even he found of great difficulty, as he says:

"...I found the task so truly arduous... that I was almost tempted to think... that the movement of the heart was only to be comprehended by God. For I could neither rightly perceive at first when the systole and when the diastole took place by reason of the rapidity of the movement..."[26]

This initial thought led Harvey's ambition and assiduousness to a detailed analysis of the overall structure of the heart (studied with less hindrances in cold-blooded animals). After this, Harvey goes on to an analysis of the arteries, showing how their pulsation depends upon the contraction of the left ventricle, while the contraction of the right ventricle propels its charge of blood into the pulmonary artery. Whilst doing this, the physician reiterates the fact that these two ventricles move together almost simultaneously and not independently as had been thought previously by his predecessors. This discovery was made while observing the heart of such animals as the eel and several other types of fish; indeed, the general study of countless animals was of utmost importance to the physician: among the ones already cited, one can add the study of the snail, the invisible shrimp, the chick before its hatching and even the pigeon. A digression to an experiment can be made to this note: using the inactive heart of a dead pigeon and placing upon it a finger wet with saliva, Harvey was able to witness a transitory and yet incontrovertible pulsation. He had just witnessed the heart's ability to recover from fatigue.
As early as the 17th century, William Harvey had already discerned the existence of the Ductus Arteriosus and explained its relative function. Here he says, "...in embryos, whilst the lungs are in a state of inaction, performing no function, subject to no movement any more than if they had not been present, Nature uses the two ventricles of the heart as if they formed but one for the transmission of the blood."[27] However, the apex of Harvey's work is probably the eighth chapter, in which he deals with the actual quantity of blood passing through the heart from the veins to the arteries. Coming into conflict with Galen's accepted view of the liver as the origin of venous blood, Harvey estimated the capacity of the heart, how much blood is expelled through each pump of the heart, and the number of times the heart beats in a half an hour. All of these estimates were purposefully low, so that people could see the vast amount of blood Galen's theory required the liver to produce. He estimated that the capacity of the heart was 1.5 imperial fluid ounces (43 ml), and that every time the heart pumps, 1/8 of that blood is expelled. This led to Harvey's estimate that about 1⁄6 imperial fluid ounce (4.7 ml) of blood went through the heart every time it pumped. The next estimate he used was that the heart beats 1000 times every half an hour, which gave 10 pounds 6 ounces of blood in a half an hour, and when this number was multiplied by 48 half hours in a day he realized that the liver would have to produce 540 pounds of blood in a day.[contradictory]
Having this simple but essential mathematical proportion at hand – which proved the overall impossible aforementioned role of the liver – Harvey went on to prove how the blood circulated in a circle by means of countless experiments initially done on serpents and fish: tying their veins and arteries in separate periods of time, Harvey noticed the modifications which occurred; indeed, as he tied the veins, the heart would become empty, while as he did the same to the arteries, the organ would swell up.




Image of veins from Harvey's Exercitatio Anatomica de Motu Cordis et Sanguinis in Animalibus


This process was later performed on the human body (in the image on the right): the physician tied a tight ligature onto the upper arm of a person. This would cut off blood flow from the arteries and the veins. When this was done, the arm below the ligature was cool and pale, while above the ligature it was warm and swollen. The ligature was loosened slightly, which allowed blood from the arteries to come into the arm, since arteries are deeper in the flesh than the veins. When this was done, the opposite effect was seen in the lower arm. It was now warm and swollen. The veins were also more visible, since now they were full of blood. Harvey then noticed little bumps in the veins, which he realized were the valves of the veins, discovered by his teacher, Hieronymus Fabricius. Harvey tried to push blood in the vein down the arm, but to no avail. When he tried to push it up the arm, it moved quite easily. The same effect was seen in other veins of the body, except the veins in the neck. Those veins were different from the others – they did not allow blood to flow up, but only down. This led Harvey to believe that the veins allowed blood to flow to the heart, and the valves maintained the one way flow.
Contrary to a popular misconception, Harvey did not predict the existence of capillaries. His observations convinced him that direct connection between veins and arteries are unnecessary; he wrote "blood permeates the pores" in the flesh and it is "absorbed and imbibed from every part" by the veins.[28]
Views of the circulation of blood before Harvey[edit]
At the time of Harvey's publication, Galen had been an influential medical authority for several centuries. Galen believed that blood passed between the ventricles by means of invisible pores. According to Galen's views, the venous system was quite separate from the arterial system, except when they came in contact through the unseen pores. Arabic scholar Ibn al-Nafis had disputed aspects of Galen's views, providing a model that seems to imply a form of pulmonary circulation in his Commentary on Anatomy in Avicenna's Canon (1242). Al-Nafis stated that blood moved from the heart to the lungs, where it mixed with air, and then back to the heart, from which it spread to the rest of the body.[29] Harvey's discoveries inevitably and historically came into conflict with Galen's teachings and the publication of his treatise De Motu Cordis incited considerable controversy within the medical community. Some doctors affirmed they would "rather err with Galen than proclaim the truth with Harvey."[30][31] Galen incompletely perceived the function of the heart, believing it a "productor of heat", while the function of its affluents, the arteries, was that of cooling the blood as the lungs "...fanned and cooled the heart itself".[32] Galen thought that during dilation the arteries sucked in air, while during their contraction they discharged vapours through pores in the flesh and skin.
Until the 17th century, two separate systems were thought to be involved in blood circulation: the natural system, containing venous blood which had its origin in the liver, and the vital system, containing arterial blood and the 'spirits' which flowed from the heart, distributing heat and life to all parts. Like bellows, the lungs fanned and cooled this vital blood.
Independently of Ibn Al-Nafis, Michael Servetus identified pulmonary circulation, but this discovery did not reach the public because it was written down for the first time in the Manuscript of Paris in 1546.[33] It was later published in the theological work which caused his execution in 1553, almost all copies of which were destroyed. In: Christianismi Restitutio, Book V, the Aragonese Miguel Servet (Michel de Villeneuve, 1509?–1553) wrote: 'The blood is passed through the pulmonary artery to the pulmonary vein for a lengthy pass through the lungs, during which it becomes red, and gets rid of the sooty fumes by the act of exhalation'.
Pulmonary circulation was described by Renaldus Columbus, Andrea Cesalpino and Vesalius, before Harvey would provide a refined and complete description of the circulatory system.
On Animal Generation[edit]
Harvey's other major work was Exercitationes de generatione animalium (On Animal Generation_, published in 1651. He had been working on it for many years but might never have finished it without the encouragement of his friend George Ent.[34]
The book starts with a description of development of the hen's egg. The major part is theoretical, dealing with Aristotle's theories and the work of the physicians following Galen and up to Fabricius. Finally he deals with embryogenesis in viviparous animals especially hinds and does. The treatment is generally Aristotelian and limited by use of a simple magnifying lens.
Needham claims the following achievements for this work.[35]

His doctrine of omne vivum ex ovo (all life comes from the egg) was the first definite statement against the idea of spontaneous generation. He denied the possibility of generation from excrement and from mud, and pointed out that even worms have eggs.
He identified the citricula as the point in the yolk from which the embryo develops and the blastoderm surrounding the embryo.
He destroyed once and for all the Aristotelian (semen-blood) and Epicurean (semen-semen) theories of early embryogeny.
He settled the long controversy about which parts of the egg were nutritive and which was formative, by demonstrating the unreality of the distinction.

Legacy[edit]




William Harvey on a 1957 Soviet postage stamp


A final allusion to the rules established and followed by the physician throughout his life can be made:


"That none be taken into the Hospital but such as be curable, or but a certain number of such as are curable.
That none lurk here for relief only or for slight causes.
That the Chirurgions, in all difficult cases or where inward physic may be necessary, shall consult with the Doctor, at the times he sitteth once in the week and then the Surgeon himself relate to the Doctor what he conceiveth of the cure and what he hath done therein.
That no Chirurgion or his man do trepan the head, pierce the body, dismember, or do any great operation on the body of any but with the approbation and the direction of the Doctor..."[36]


Arthur Schlesinger Jr. included William Harvey in a list of "The Ten Most Influential People of the Second Millennium" in the World Almanac & Book of Facts.
The main lecture theatre of the School of Clinical Medicine, University of Cambridge is named after William Harvey, who was an alumnus of the institute.
Harvey's whalebone demonstration rod, tipped with silver, resides in the silver room of the museum of the Royal College of Physicians. He used it to point to objects during his lectures.[37]
Personality[edit]
In terms of his personality, information shows that William Harvey was seen as a "...humorous but extremely precise man...",[38] how he was often so immersed in his own thoughts that he would often suffer from insomnia (cured with a simple walk through the house), and how he was always ready for an open and direct conversation. He also loved the darkness, for it is said that it was there where "...he could best contemplate", thus sometimes hiding out in caves. A heavy drinker of coffee, Harvey would walk out combing his hair every morning full of energy and enthusiastic spirit through the fields. We have also come to understand Harvey's somewhat unorthodox method of dealing with his gout, here cited completely: "...his [Harvey's] cure was thus: he would sit with his legs bare...put them into a pail of water till he was almost dead with cold, then betake himself to his stove, and so 'twas gone".[39] Apart from the already mentioned love of literature, Harvey was also an intense and dedicated observer of birds during his free time: several long and detailed passages of citations could be written delineating his observations in such places as the "Pile of Boulders" (a small island in Lancashire) and 'Bass Rock' (island off the East Coast of Scotland).
Gallery[edit]







William Harvey









Color portrait









William Harvey, after a painting by Cornelius Jansen









William Harvey




Works[edit]

Harvey, William (1889). On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals. London: George Bell and Sons. 
Harvey, William; Franklin, Kenneth J. (translator); Wear, Andrew (introduction) (1993). The Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings. London: Everyman: Orion Publishing Group. ISBN 0-460-87362-8. 
The Works of William Harvey. Robert Willis (translator). London: Sydenham Society. 1847.  Includes:

An anatomical disquisition on the motion of the heart and blood in animals
2 disquisitions addressed to John Riolan, including refutations to objections to the circulation of the blood
Anatomical exercises on the generation of animals. To which are added:

On Parturition
On the uterine membranes and humours
On conception


Anatomical examination of the body of Thomas Parr
Letters



See also[edit]

Miguel Servet
Amato Lusitano – Portuguese 16th century physician, also credited with the discovery of the circulation of the blood
Josephus Struthius
Scientific revolution
List of multiple discoveries

References[edit]


^ H. Ben-Yami, Descartes' Philosophical Revolution: A Reassessment, Palgrave Macmillan, 2015, p. 76.
^ "There's a reasonable basis to assume that it was Dr. Amatus who first discovered the "Blood circulation" phenomena". Retrieved 8 December 2012. 
^ Wilson and Aubrey (1962). "Malter Warner". Aubrey's Brief Lives. Michigan U. Press. p. 315. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ Power, pp. 4.
^ "Harvie, William (HRVY593W)". A Cambridge Alumni Database. University of Cambridge. 
^ Power, pp. 26–27.
^ Power, pp. 29.
^ Power, pp. 35–36.
^ Power, pp. 52.
^ Power, pp. 62–64.
^ Gregory, Andrew. "William Harvey, English physician". Encyclopædia Britannica Online. 
^ Power, pp. 71.
^ Power, pp. 72.
^ Power, pp. 74.
^ Power, d'Arcey. Life of Harvey. Longmans, Green, & co. 
^ BMJ 18 September 1926
^ Selected Writings of Joseph Needham ed Mansell Davies
^ Power, pp. 85–86.
^ Edward Chaney, The Grand Tour and the Great Rebellion: Richard Lassels and 'The Voyage of Italy' in the Seventeenth Century (Geneva-Turin, 1985), pp. 291–93.
^ Power, pp. 125.
^ Power, pp. 130.
^ Power, pp. 150–151.
^ Power, pp. 166–167.
^ Power, pp. 169.
^ Power, pp. 174–175.
^ Power, pp. 193.
^ Power, pp. 202–203.
^ As cited in: Douglas Allchin, "Pseudohistory and Pseudoscience", Science & Education 13: 179–195, 2004
^ Haddad SI, Khairallah AA (1936). "A FORGOTTEN CHAPTER IN THE HISTORY OF THE CIRCULATION OF THE BLOOD". Ann. Surg. 104: 1–8. PMC 1390327 . PMID 17856795. 
^ Regina Bailey. "William Harvey – Father of Cardiovascular Medicine". about.com. Retrieved 26 September 2010. 
^ National Anti-Vivisection Society (Great Britain) (1894). The Animal's defender and zoophilist, Volume 13. 20, Victoria Street, London, S.W.: The Victoria Street Society for the Protection of Animals from Vivisection. p. 297. 
^ William Osler, The Evolution of Modern Medicine, Kaplan Publishing, 2009 ISBN 1607140535
^ Michael Servetus Research Website with graphical study on the Manuscript of Paris by Servetus
^ French, Roger. "William Harvey". Oxford Dictionary of National Biography (online ed.). Oxford University Press. doi:10.1093/ref:odnb/12531. Retrieved 1 January 2014.  (Subscription or UK public library membership required.)
^ Needham, Joseph (1934). A History of Embryology. pp. 133–153. 
^ Power, pp. 99–103.
^ Munk, William. "William Harvey". Royal Society of Physicians, Lives of the Fellows, Volume I. p. 124. 
^ Power, pp. 145.
^ Power, pp. 144.


Further reading[edit]

Butterfield, Herbert (1957). The Origins of Modern Science (revised ed.). New York: The Free Press. 
Power, D'Arcy (1897). William Harvey: Masters of Medicine. T. Fisher Unwin. ISBN 978-1-4179-6578-6. 
Gregory, Andrew (2001). Harvey's Heart, The Discovery of Blood Circulation. Cambridge, England: Icon Books. 
Harris, Paul (2007). William Harvey, Folkestone's Most Famous Son. Folkestone: Lilburne Press. 
Kearney, Hugh (1971). Science and Change 1500 – 1700. New York: McGraw-Hill. 
Mitchell, Silas Weir (1907). Some Memoranda in Regard to William Harvey, M.D. 
Munk, William (1878). The Roll of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Vol. I (2nd ed.). London. pp. 124–146. 
Rapson, Helen (1982). The Circulation of the Blood. London: Frederick Muller. 
Singer, Charles (1959). A History of Biology (third, revised ed.). London: Abelard-Schuman. 
Wright, Thomas (2012). Circulation: William Harvey's Revolutionary Idea. London: Chatto. 
Royal Society of Medicine (Great Britain) (1913). Portraits of Dr. William Harvey. London: Humphrey Milford, Oxford University Press. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to William Harvey.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: William Harvey



Works by William Harvey at Faded Page (Canada)
William Harvey info from the (US) National Health Museum
The Harvey Genealogist: The Harvey Book: PART ONE (mentions William Harvey and various ancestors and relatives)
William Harvey: "On The Motion Of The Heart And Blood In Animals", 1628
Images from De motu cordis From The College of Physicians of Philadelphia Digital Library



Academic offices


Preceded by
Nathaniel Brent
Warden of Merton College, Oxford
1645–1648
Succeeded by
Nathaniel Brent








v
t
e


History of biology



Fields and
disciplines



History of agriculture
History of agricultural science
History of anatomy
History of botany
History of evolutionary thought
History of ecology
History of medicine
History of model organisms
History of plant systematics
History of paleontology
History of geology
History of zoology (through 1859)
History of zoology (since 1859)
History of phycology
History of genetics
History of biochemistry
History of molecular biology
History of RNA biology
History of molecular evolution
History of immunology
History of biotechnology








Institutions



Rothamsted Experimental Station
Pasteur Institute
Max Planck Society
Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory
Stazione Zoologica
Marine Biological Laboratory
Rockefeller University
Woods Hole Oceanographic Institute
Laboratory of Molecular Biology





Experiments



Griffith's experiment (1928)
Luria–Delbrück experiment (1943)
Avery–MacLeod–McCarty experiment (1944)
Miller–Urey experiment (1952)
Hershey–Chase experiment (1952)
Meselson–Stahl experiment (1958)
Crick, Brenner et al. experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Matthaei experiment (1961)
Nirenberg and Leder experiment (1964)





Theories and
concepts



Germ theory of disease
Central dogma of molecular biology
Darwinism
Great chain of being
Hierarchy of life
Lamarckism
One gene–one enzyme hypothesis
Protocell
RNA world hypothesis
Sequence hypothesis
Spontaneous generation





Influential figures





Classical antiquity




Aristotle

Aristotle's biology
On Generation and Corruption
History of Animals


Theophrastus

Historia Plantarum


Pedanius Dioscorides

De Materia Medica


Galen






Renaissance,
Early Modern




Conrad Gessner

Historia animalium


Andreas Vesalius

De humani corporis fabrica


William Harvey

De Motu Cordis


Antonie van Leeuwenhoek

Micrographia


Francesco Redi






18th and
19th centuries




Carolus Linnaeus

Systema Naturae


Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon

Histoire Naturelle


Jean-Baptiste Lamarck

Philosophie Zoologique


Alexander von Humboldt
Charles Lyell

Principles of Geology


Robert Chambers

Vestiges of the Natural History of Creation


Charles Darwin

On the Origin of Species
The Descent of Man


Alfred Russel Wallace
Henry Walter Bates
Gregor Mendel

"Experiments on Plant Hybridization"


Ronald Fisher

"On Mendelian Inheritance"


Louis Pasteur
Robert Koch
Ernst Haeckel
Ivan Pavlov
Sergei Winogradsky
Jacques Loeb
Hugo de Vries
E. B. Wilson






20th century




Thomas Hunt Morgan
Aleksandr Oparin
Alexander Fleming
Edmund Jaeger
J. B. S. Haldane
Sewall Wright
R. A. Fisher
What Is Life?
Konrad Lorenz
Barbara McClintock
Theodosius Dobzhansky

Genetics and the Origin of Species


Ernst Mayr
George Beadle
Seymour Benzer
Rosalind Franklin

Photo 51


James D. Watson and Francis Crick

"Molecular structure of Nucleic Acids"


"Sickle Cell Anemia, a Molecular Disease"
Fred Sanger
Max Perutz
John Kendrew
Sydney Brenner
Joshua Lederberg
Walter Gilbert
Kary Mullis
Stephen Jay Gould
Lynn Margulis
Carl Woese
Jane Goodall








Related



History of science
Philosophy of biology
Timeline of biology and organic chemistry
Ethnobotany
Natural history
Natural philosophy
Natural theology
Humboldtian science
Relationship between religion and science
Eugenics
Human Genome Project
History of creationism
History of the creation-evolution controversy








 Category
 Commons
 Portal









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 29584187
LCCN: n79021742
ISNI: 0000 0001 2095 8361
GND: 118546481
SELIBR: 205433
SUDOC: 030822556
BNF: cb122160891 (data)
MGP: 125274
NDL: 00522442
NKC: nlk20000079343
BNE: XX1724032










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=William_Harvey&oldid=788859361"					
Categories: 1578 births1657 deaths17th-century English medical doctors17th-century Latin-language writersAlumni of Gonville and Caius College, CambridgeAlumni of the Medical College of St Bartholomew's HospitalBritish anatomistsBritish biologistsEnglish AnglicansFellows of Merton College, OxfordHistory of anatomyPeople educated at The King's School, CanterburyPeople from FolkestoneUniversity of Padua alumniWardens of Merton College, OxfordPeople of the Tudor periodPeople of the Stuart periodHidden categories: Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the ODNBWikipedia pending changes protected pages (level 1)Use dmy dates from March 2015All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2017Articles contradicting other articlesArticles with Project Gutenberg linksWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquoteWikisource 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaБеларускаяБългарскиBosanskiBrezhonegCatalàЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançaisGaeilgeGalego한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiIdoBahasa IndonesiaInterlinguaItalianoעבריתBasa JawaქართულიҚазақшаKurdîLatinaLatviešuLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиMalagasyമലയാളംမြန်မာဘာသာNederlands日本語НохчийнNorsk bokmålଓଡ଼ିଆOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийसंस्कृतम्Simple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்తెలుగుไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 3 July 2017, at 22:35.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.







William J Harvey - Russell, PA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found William J Harvey in Russell, PA


William J Harvey

                                                                           Intelius found that William J Harvey  is  a male between 50 and 60 years old from Russell, PA.  We have connected them to
                4 addresses,
                3 phones,
                and 3 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

William W Harvey


Get Report Now

Age

William J Harvey is in his 50s

William Has Lived In

Russell, PA
Pittsburgh, PA

William's Relatives

Amy Harvey
Wendie Harvey
Benjamin Harvey







William J Harvey



Zodiac SignTaurus



GenderMale



Get Report Now










Want to know more about William? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about William, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on William J Harvey
Get a Criminal Check on William J Harvey
Get a Public Record Report on William J Harvey
Get a People Search Report on William J Harvey


William J Harvey's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where William J Harvey has lived as well as William J Harvey's phone numbers and email addresses.




William J Harvey Has Lived in 1 States
Pennsylvania Address for William J Harvey


6 E V***** V*** D* 

Russell, PA


Has Lived In

Russell, PA
Pittsburgh, PA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with William J Harvey

(814) ***-**** - Russell, PA 
(412) ***-**** - Pittsburgh, PA 
(814) ***-**** - Russell, PA 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with William J Harvey



Get Email Report




William J Harvey's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for William J Harvey


William J Harvey's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of William J Harvey's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
William Harvey
Username Matches

                  WilliamHarvey
                  HarveyWilliam
                  William.Harvey
                  Harvey.William
                  William_Harvey
                  Harvey_William
                  William-Harvey
                  Harvey-William
                  WHarvey
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
W Harvey







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.











Harvey William W in Pierpont, Ohio with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomePierpont, OHHarvey William WPierpont, OH Harvey William WAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your other collection!Error when adding to other collectionThis business was removed from the other collection1. William W HarveyState Rt 7Pierpont, OH 44082(440) 594-1136Dump Truck ServiceTruckingSponsored LinksShowing1-1
of 1resultsMap ViewSponsoredBetter-N-Bulk2121 State Route 45, Austinburg, OH 44010(440) 275-1465The Little Store with a Whole Lot MoreWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback








 | Oatey









































































My Account


Region


Search








OATEY















Products



Cements, Primers & Cleaners 



Oatey PVC Cements
Loading...



Oatey ABS Cements
Loading...



Oatey Specialty Solvent Cements
Loading...



Oatey Primers & Cleaners
Loading...



Oatey CPVC Cements
Loading...



Hercules PVC Cements
Loading...



Hercules CPVC Cements
Loading...



Hercules Primers & Cleaners
Loading...



Hercules ABS Cements
Loading...



Hercules Multi-Purpose Cement
Loading...



United Elchem CPVC, ABS & Multi-Purpose Cements
Loading...



United Elchem PVC Cements
Loading...



United Elchem Primers & Cleaners
Loading...



United Elchem Tite-Series Cements
Loading...



Harvey PVC Cements
Loading...



Harvey Specialty Cements
Loading...



Harvey CPVC Cements
Loading...



Harvey Primers & Cleaners
Loading...



Harvey ABS Cements
Loading...



Accessories
Loading...





Thread Sealants 



Leak Detectors
Loading...



Thread Sealant Paste
Loading...



Thread Sealant Tape
Loading...





Copper Installation 



Solder
Loading...



Flux
Loading...



Accessories
Loading...





Putty, Caulks & Water Barriers 



Caulk
Loading...



Plumber's Putty
Loading...



Epoxy Putty
Loading...





Oils, Lubricants & Hand Cleaners 



Cutting Oil
Loading...



Grease & Lubricants
Loading...



Hand Cleaners
Loading...





Drain & Waste System Cleaners 



Crystal
Loading...



Liquid
Loading...



Septic & Cesspool Cleaners
Loading...





Heating Chemicals & Antifreeze 



System Repair
Loading...



System Cleaners
Loading...



Heating Essentials
Loading...



Antifreeze
Loading...



System Testing
Loading...





Wax Gaskets & Bolts 



Toilet Bolts
Loading...



Liquilock™
Loading...



Wax Gaskets
Loading...





Drains & Closet Flanges 



Closet Flanges
Loading...



Shower Drains
Loading...



Floor Drains
Loading...



DWV Accessories
Loading...



Backwater Valves & Accessories
Loading...



Set-Rite
Loading...





Shower Pan Liners 



Liners
Loading...



Accessories & Kits
Loading...



Adhesives
Loading...





Supply Boxes 



Moda® Modular Supply Box System
Loading...



2 x 4 Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



Metal Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



Centro II Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



Eliminator® Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



Quadtro® Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



Fire-Rated Washing Machine Boxes
Loading...



I2K Ice Maker Boxes
Loading...



Metal Ice Maker Boxes
Loading...



Round Ice Maker Boxes
Loading...



Square Ice Maker Boxes
Loading...



Fire-Rated Ice Maker Boxes
Loading...



Valve Accessories
Loading...





Flashings 



Galvanized
Loading...



Plastic
Loading...



Aluminum
Loading...



Copper
Loading...



Specialty
Loading...



Rain Collar For No-Calk® Roof Flashings
Loading...





Air Admittance Valves (AAV) 



6 DFU Air Admittance Valves
Loading...



20 DFU Air Admittance Valves
Loading...



160 DFU Air Admittance Valves
Loading...



500 DFU Air Admittance Valves
Loading...



AAV Box
Loading...



Inline Vent
Loading...





Pipe Support 



Supply Hangers (CTS)
Loading...



DWV Hangers
Loading...



Guards
Loading...



Brackets
Loading...





Brass, Plastic & Commercial Tubular/Grab Bars 



P-Traps
Loading...



S-Traps
Loading...



Disposer Kits
Loading...



Extension Tubes
Loading...



Outlet Waste
Loading...



Strainer Tailpieces
Loading...



Wall Tubes
Loading...



Waste Arms
Loading...



Accessories
Loading...



Sink Traps
Loading...



Grab Bars
Loading...



Safety Covers
Loading...



Branch Tailpieces
Loading...





Bath Waste & Overflow 



Conversion Kits
Loading...



Full Kits
Loading...



Half Kits
Loading...



Quarter Kits
Loading...



Rough-In Kits
Loading...



Trim Kits
Loading...





Pneumatic Test Balls 



Blocking Plugs
Loading...



Bypass Plugs
Loading...



Sewer Air Test Plugs
Loading...





Baskets & Sink Strainers 



Basket Strainers
Loading...



Bar Sink
Loading...



Accessories
Loading...





Mechanical Test Plugs 



Original Gripper
Loading...



Hub-Fit Gripper®
Loading...



Clean-Out Gripper® Plugs
Loading...



T-Handle Gripper ®
Loading...



Iron Grip
Loading...



Econ-O-Grip®
Loading...



Petro Econ-O-Grip®
Loading...



Kwik ‘N Sure®
Loading...



Sure-Grip®
Loading...



Monitor-Well Plugs
Loading...





Test Ball & Plug Accessories 



Deflection Gauges
Loading...



Testing Equipment
Loading...



Tools & Accessories
Loading...





Pans & Stands 



Washing Machine Pans
Loading...



Water Heater Pans
Loading...



Water Heater Stands
Loading...



Adapters
Loading...





Commercial Drains 



True Set Commercial Drains & Cleanouts
Loading...



Flanged General Purpose Drains and Clean-Outs
Loading...



General Purpose Drains and Clean-Outs
Loading...



Sediment Drains
Loading...



Roof Drains
Loading...



General Purpose Commercial Drain Accessories
Loading...



Roof and Sediment Drain Accessories
Loading...



Floor Sinks and Strainers
Loading...





Rough-In Products 



Tub Protector
Loading...



Tub Box
Loading...



Access Panels
Loading...



Pipe Guard
Loading...



Toilet Base Plate
Loading...



Test Caps
Loading...



Harvey Plungers
Loading...



Quiet Pipes®
Loading...







Brands


Cherne
Dearborn
Harvey
Hercules
Oatey
United Elchem



Resources


Builder


Engineer


Contractor


DIY



Company


About Us


Company History


Patents/Trademarks


Careers


Contact Us


Purpose, Values & Vision









Coming Soon
Login / RegisterComing Soon




Project List 











Products 


Cements, Primers & Cleaners

Thread Sealants

Copper Installation

Putty, Caulks & Water Barriers

Oils, Lubricants & Hand Cleaners

Drain & Waste System Cleaners

Heating Chemicals & Antifreeze

Wax Gaskets & Bolts

Drains & Closet Flanges

Shower Pan Liners

Supply Boxes

Flashings

Air Admittance Valves (AAV)

Pipe Support

Brass, Plastic & Commercial Tubular/Grab Bars

Bath Waste & Overflow

Pneumatic Test Balls

Baskets & Sink Strainers

Mechanical Test Plugs

Test Ball & Plug Accessories

Pans & Stands

Commercial Drains

Rough-In Products


Brands 

Cherne
Dearborn
Harvey
Hercules
Oatey
United Elchem


Resources 

Builder
Engineer
Contractor
DIY


Company 

About Us
Company History
Patents/Trademarks
Careers
Contact Us
Purpose, Values & Vision



Project List 










Home











			Sort By Category
			


 

Cements, Primers & Cleaners


Thread Sealants


Copper Installation


Putty, Caulks & Water Barriers


Oils, Lubricants & Hand Cleaners


Drain & Waste System Cleaners


Heating Chemicals & Antifreeze


Wax Gaskets & Bolts


Drains & Closet Flanges


Shower Pan Liners


Supply Boxes


Flashings


Air Admittance Valves (AAV)


Pipe Support


Brass, Plastic & Commercial Tubular/Grab Bars


Bath Waste & Overflow


Pneumatic Test Balls


Baskets & Sink Strainers


Mechanical Test Plugs


Test Ball & Plug Accessories


Pans & Stands


Commercial Drains


Rough-In Products




		Brands 


 
Cherne
Dearborn
Harvey
Hercules
Oatey
United Elchem







	No Content Available
	












Product Info

Product Catalog
How to videos
Faq
Articles
Warranty





Company Info

About Us
Company History
Patents/trademarks
Careers





Customer Support

Contact Us
Portal Login - Coming Soon
Submit an Idea










the choice of plumbing professionals







follow us








Download Our Apps








Terms of Use
Supply Chain Information
Sitemap

© 2017 OATEY. All Rights Reserved.



follow us














LoginSign Up




User Name



Password






Remember me

Forgot your Password?

















My Cart

 ITEM(S)









Title

Part Number: 
MPN: 



Qty: 
Lead Time: 




Continue Shopping
Checkout










Attention!!

































































An Email Id is required to process your orders. Please enter your email id and click update.





Email





















William W. Harvey, Inc. - Company Profile










































 William W. Harvey, Inc.
                        

Archived Record













Follow



 Share
                        





 PDF
                        

 Excel
                        
























William W. Harvey, Inc. Overview
  William W. Harvey, Inc. filed as an Articles of Incorporation in the State of California and is no longer active. This corporate entity was filed approximately sixty-eight years ago on Monday, February 21, 1949 as recorded in documents filed with California Secretary of State. 




Sponsored


             Learn More
        
        D&B Reports Available for

        William W. Harvey, Inc.
    













Corporate Filings for William W. Harvey, Inc.








California Secretary of State





                                    Filing Type:
                                

Articles of Incorporation                                



                                    Status:
                                

Inactive




                                    State:
                                

                                    California
                                



                                    State ID:
                                

                                    00234268
                                



                                    Date Filed:
                                

                                        Monday, February 21, 1949
                                    



                                        Registered Agent
                                    











Advertisements










Source







California Secretary of State
                                Data last refreshed on Monday, July 3, 2017
                            









What next?






Follow


Receive an email notification when changes occur for William W. Harvey, Inc..
Notifications include:

New company roles
Change in active status
Location updates
New connections






Follow








Create Account


Create a free account to access additional details for William W. Harvey, Inc. and other profiles that you visit
Benefits include:

Access to more records
Full screen network visualizer
Follow profiles
See how people are connected




 Create Account
                                














            Advertisements
        





















                Wiki
            


 Edit this profile
                




1
                    Corporate Records

                



                                CA

1949
Articles of Incorporation
                            





                Source
            





                        California Secretary of State
                    







top






















You must be signed in to print.
Once signed in, look for the PDF button.
















WM Harvey Manufacturing Co.










History
Vision
FAQ's



Solvent Cements, Primers & Cleaners
Pipe Thread Sealants and Tapes, Lubricants &
Gasket Materials
Wax Toilet Bowl Gaskets & Toilet Installation Kits
Epoxy & Plumbers Putty, Caulks & Sealants
Washing Machine Hoses & Washing Machine Boxes
Toilet Repair Parts & Fasteners
Soldering & Abrasive Supplies
Antifreeze, Spa/Hot Tub Chemicals, Hand & Surface Cleaners
Drain Cleaning Chemicals & Tools
Genuine Sloan Valves, Repair Parts & Urinal Screens
Sinks/Tubs/Drain Replacement Parts, "O" Rings & Faucet Washers
Shower Pan Liner, Plumbing Construction Materials & Tools
Plastic & Corrugated Bin Boxes, Nipple Caddies & Accessories




MSDS Sheets
Product Info Sheets
Catalog PDF's

 






Quality Plumbing Products and Specialties















More than 3500 plumbing specialty items... 
Welcome to the William H. Harvey Company, today we have more than 3500 plumbing specialty items that are sold throughout North and South America. It would be difficult to find a hardware store that does not stock some products made by the Harvey Company. 135 sales representatives call on over 5,000 plumbing and hardware wholesalers nationally. New items are added every year.
We specialize in the areas of: 

Solvent Cements, Primers & Cleaners
Pipe Thread Sealants & Tapes, Lubricants and Gasket Materials
Wax Toilet Bowl Gaskets and Toilet Installation Kits
Epoxy & Plumbers Putty, Caulks and Sealants
Washing Machine Hoses, Washing Machine Boxes, Sink/Tub/Drain Products
Toilet Repair Parts and Fasteners
Soldering and Abrasive Supplies
Antifreeze, Spa/Hot Tub Chemicals and Hand & Surface Cleaners
Drain Cleaning Chemicals and Tools
Genuine Sloan Valves, Repair Parts and Urinal Screens
Sinks/Tub/Drain Replacement Parts "O" Rings & Faucet Washers
Shower Pan Liner, Plumbing Construction Materials and Tools
Plastic & Corrugated Bin Boxes, Nipple Caddies and Accessories


 
 
SITE MAP
 




 
Copyright® 2012 William H. Harvey Manufacturing Co. All Rights Reserved.
 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft




















Amazon.com: harvey william: Books







 


























Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Books



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






Books Advanced Search New Releases NEW! Amazon Charts Best Sellers & More The New York Times® Best Sellers Children's Books Textbooks Textbook Rentals Sell Us Your Books Best Books of the Month Kindle eBooks 


















































































1-12 of 3,278 results for Books : 
"harvey william"


"harvey william" 
                                





                                 Cancel









Sort by 
Relevance
Featured
Price: Low to High
Price: High to Low
Avg. Customer Review
Publication Date
Most reviews

























Book Format:Paperback|Kindle Edition|Audible Audio Edition|Loose Leaf|Audio CD|See moreHardcover



William Harvey and the Circulation of the BloodJul 6, 2010by Thomas Henry HuxleyPaperback
$
9
99

PrimeGet it by Monday, Jul 24FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$9.99(10 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
0
00

Auto-delivered wirelesslyOther Formats:Paperback
3.8 out of 5 stars
5The Witches of DirragionAug 20, 2015by William HarveyKindle Edition
$
0
00

Auto-delivered wirelessly
5 out of 5 stars
2Spanish for Educators: with MP3 CDSep 1, 2015by William C. Harvey M.S.Paperback
$
16
49

$24.99PrimeGet it by Monday, Jul 24FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$4.99(47 used &amp new offers)
4.6 out of 5 stars
3William Harvey and the Discovery of the Circulation of the BloodJun 21, 2016by Huxley Thomas HenryPaperback
$
18
95

PrimeFREE Shipping on eligible ordersUsually ships in 1 to 4 weeksMore Buying Choices$18.95(6 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
0
99

Auto-delivered wirelessly









THE BIG BOOK OF SPOOKY TALES - Horror Classics Anthology: Number 13, The Deserted House, The Man with the Pale Eyes, The Oblong Box, The Birth-Mark, A ... by Hope, The Mysterious Card and many moreMay 5, 2017by Nathaniel Hawthorne and Edgar Allan PoeKindle Edition
$
0
99

Auto-delivered wirelessly
5 out of 5 stars
1Ingles para el lugar de trabajo: English for the Workplace (Spanish Edition)Jan 1, 2011by William C. Harvey M.S.Paperback
$
10
98

$14.99PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 21FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$2.50(62 used &amp new offers)
4.6 out of 5 stars
6Ingles para Latinos, Level 1Aug 1, 2011by William C. Harvey M.S.Paperback
$
9
25

$10.99PrimeGet it by TODAY, Jul 21FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$6.92(56 used &amp new offers)
4.5 out of 5 stars
127Ingles para Latinos, Level 2Apr 1, 2009by William C. Harvey M.S.Paperback
$
10
00

$12.99PrimeGet it by Tomorrow, Jul 22FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$2.50(44 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
9
50

Auto-delivered wirelessly
4.6 out of 5 stars
51William Harvey: A Life in CirculationOct 1, 2012by Thomas WrightHardcover
$
5
90

$33.95Only 2 left in stock - order soon.More Buying Choices$0.01(77 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
13
79

Auto-delivered wirelessly
3.3 out of 5 stars
6Famous Modern Ghost StoriesMar 30, 2011by Leonid Nikolayevich Andreyev and Arthur MachenKindle Edition
$
0
00

Auto-delivered wirelessly
3.7 out of 5 stars
37On the Motion of the Heart and Blood in Animals: A New Edition of William Harvey's Exercitatio anatomica de motu cordis et sanguinis in animalibusAug 4, 2016by William Harvey and Jarrett A. CartyPaperback
$
17
00

PrimeGet it by Monday, Jul 24FREE Shipping on eligible ordersMore Buying Choices$15.09(9 used &amp new offers)Kindle Edition
$
9
99

Auto-delivered wirelesslyOther Formats:Paperback, HardcoverThe Circulation of the Blood and Other Writings (Everyman Library)Oct 15, 1993by Andrew Wear and William HarveyPaperback$1.99(11 used &amp new offers)Paperback$4.26(10 used &amp new offers)Other Formats:Hardcover












 
Previous Page
1
2
3
...
100
 
Next Page
















Sponsored Links
(What's this?)








Ad feedback











Search FeedbackDid you find what you were looking for?YesNo
Choose a category that best describes the issue that you are having with the search:Choose a category…I need to talk to customer service.I still haven't found what I'm looking for.How do I filter or sort my search ?Something is broken.A picture or description looks wrong.Could you add a feature ?Could you start carrying a product not listed here ?Choose a category…







Leave us some comments about your search; your comments can help make our site better for everyone.Submit

Get Express customer service or contact us by e-mail or phone.contact us

Thank you for your feedback.
If you need help or have a question for Customer Service, please visit the Help Section.
















Show results for
                                Any CategoryBooksForeign Dictionaries & ThesaurusesEnglish as a Second LanguagePolitics & Social SciencesAction & AdventureFreemasonryMedical ReferenceMedicalTravel Language PhrasebooksClassic Literature & FictionWorld War I HistoryHistoryEngineering & TransportationLiterature & FictionCrafts, Hobbies & HomeMedical BooksReferenceBiographies & MemoirsChristian Books & BiblesLawBusiness & MoneyChildren's BooksEducation & TeachingArts & PhotographyComics & Graphic NovelsComputers & TechnologyCookbooks, Food & WineGay & LesbianHealth, Fitness & DietingHumor & EntertainmentMystery, Thriller & SuspenseParenting & RelationshipsReligion & SpiritualityRomanceScience & MathScience Fiction & FantasySelf-HelpSports & OutdoorsTeen & Young AdultTest PreparationTravelSee moreRefine byDelivery DayGet It TodayGet It by TomorrowAmazon PrimeEligible for Free ShippingFree Shipping by AmazonNew ReleasesLast 30 daysLast 90 daysComing SoonAuthorWilliam C. HarveyWilliam Fryer HarveyEdgar Allan PoeAnonymousWilliam CrononBarry GrossmanHarvey A. SilverglateCharles DickensH.P. LovecraftAmbrose BierceJames GreenThomas WrightAnatole FranceAlgernon BlackwoodEdward Stanley PooleSee moreForeign Language TypeSpanishLatinBook SeriesSummitingBarron's Foreign Language GuidesPenguin ClassicsPuffin ClassicsBook FormatPaperbackKindle EditionAudible Audio EditionLoose LeafAudio CDHardcoverBook LanguageEnglishLiterature GenreShort StoriesHistoricalHorrorMystery & DetectiveThrillers & SuspenseHistorical Events & PeopleMilitary HistoryReligious HistorySocial HistoryAvg. Customer Review4 Stars & Up & Up3 Stars & Up & Up2 Stars & Up & Up1 Star & Up & UpInternational ShippingAmazonGlobal EligibleConditionCollectibleNewUsedAvailabilityInclude Out of Stock












































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started















































        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.








Back to top
Get to Know UsCareersAbout AmazonInvestor RelationsAmazon DevicesMake Money with UsSell on AmazonSell Your Services on AmazonSell on Amazon BusinessSell Your Apps on AmazonBecome an AffiliateAdvertise Your ProductsSelf-Publish with UsBecome an Amazon VendorSell Your Subscription on Amazon›See allAmazon Payment ProductsAmazon Rewards Visa Signature CardsAmazon.com Store CardAmazon.com Corporate Credit LineShop with PointsCredit Card MarketplaceReload Your BalanceAmazon Currency ConverterLet Us Help YouYour AccountYour OrdersShipping Rates & PoliciesAmazon PrimeReturns & ReplacementsManage Your Content and DevicesAmazon AssistantHelp




English



United States




Amazon Music Stream millions of songs

Amazon Drive Cloud storage from Amazon

6pm Score deals on fashion brands

AbeBooks Books, art & collectibles

ACX  Audiobook Publishing Made Easy

Alexa Actionable Analytics for the Web

Amazon Business Everything For Your Business

 

AmazonFresh Groceries & More Right To Your Door

AmazonGlobal Ship Orders Internationally

Home Services Handpicked Pros Happiness Guarantee

Amazon Inspire Digital Educational  Resources

Amazon Rapids Fun stories for  kids on the go

Amazon Restaurants Food delivery from local restaurants

Amazon Video Direct Video Distribution Made Easy

 

Amazon Web Services Scalable Cloud Computing Services

Audible Download Audio Books

AudiobookStand Discount Audiobooks on Disc

Book Depository Books With Free Delivery Worldwide

Box Office Mojo Find Movie Box Office Data

ComiXology Thousands of Digital Comics

CreateSpace Indie Print Publishing Made Easy

 

DPReview Digital Photography

East Dane Designer Men's Fashion

Fabric Sewing, Quilting & Knitting

Goodreads Book reviews & recommendations

IMDb Movies, TV & Celebrities

IMDbPro Get Info Entertainment Professionals Need

Junglee.com Shop Online in India

 

Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital Publishing Made Easy


Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Delivery on Everyday Items

Prime Photos Unlimited Photo Storage Free With Prime

Shopbop Designer Fashion Brands

TenMarks.com Math Activities for Kids & Schools

Warehouse Deals Open-Box Discounts

Whispercast Discover & Distribute Digital Content


 

 

Withoutabox Submit to Film Festivals

Woot! Deals and  Shenanigans

Zappos Shoes & Clothing

Souq.com Shop Online in the Middle East

Subscribe with Amazon Discover & try subscription services

 


Conditions of UsePrivacy NoticeInterest-Based Ads© 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates































Amazon Prime

































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















All



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 
















































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started






























 



Fast, FREE shipping and morePrime members also enjoy exclusive access to movies and TV shows, ad-free music, Kindle books, original audio series and unlimited photo storage.








Start your 30-day Prime free trial 

After your free trial, Amazon Prime is just $10.99/month.  Cancel anytime.
                    
                              See more plans  ›


Give the gift of Prime | 
                            Refer a friend | 
                            Have a Prime promo code?




    
    
    



Fast, FREE shipping on over 50 million eligible itemsChoose from FREE Two-Hour, Same-Day or Two-Day Delivery with Prime    
    
    



Need a last minute gift? Can’t get out of the house? Realize you forgot to pick up something? With FREE Two-Day Shipping and more from Amazon Prime, your shopping problems are solved. You get unlimited deliveries with no minimum order size, and with millions of eligible items, the options are practically limitless. When shipping to select metro areas, Prime members also get FREE Same-Day Delivery on over a million items and FREE 2-hour delivery with Prime Now on daily essentials and groceries. With FREE release-date delivery on eligible pre-order items, you can enjoy highly anticipated books, movies, and video games as soon as possible. 
Learn more about all the Prime shipping options

    
    
    



Enjoy instant access to video streaming    
    
    



Prime includes popular movies and TV shows    
    
    



Make every night a movie night with Prime Video. Your Prime membership includes instant access to thousands of movies and TV shows at no additional cost. Catch Amazon Original Series like Golden Globe-winning Transparent, Mozart in the Jungle, and Goliath, Emmy-winning Man in the High Castle, or exciting and wildly popular The Grand Tour. Stream on select Smart TVs, Roku, Xbox, Amazon Fire TV, iPhones, tablets, and Android devices. Download entertainment to your device to watch offline anywhere.
Browse movies and TV shows
    
    
    



Over two million songs. Thousands of playlists and stations.    
    
    



On-demand, ad-free music streaming     
    
    



Prime Music is a music streaming benefit featuring a growing selection of two million songs, Alexa voice-integration, and personalized recommendations at no additional cost with your Amazon Prime Membership. Unlock even more music with Amazon Music Unlimited, plus get an exclusive Prime member discount.
Learn more
    
    
    



Books, Magazines & More    
    
    



Unlimited reading on any device    
    
    



Prime Reading gives you unlimited access to over a thousand books, current issue magazines, books with Audible narration, comics, Kindle Singles, and more. With access from any device – including your phone, tablet, or Kindle – you can read however you want, whenever you want.
Learn more
    
    
    



Original audio series from Audible    
    
    



Unlimited listening to original audio series    
    
    



Get hooked on original audio series from Audible: hunt for clues with intrepid investigators, think big with bold visionaries, or ‘keep it real’ with fearless comedians. Listen to insightful and engaging playlists handcrafted for every interest and refreshed daily, drawing from news, comedy shows, articles, talks and more. Whether you want to turn rush hour into an adventure with a great story or master a new topic while riding the train, your commute will never be the same. Audible Channels–from Audible, a world leader in audio entertainment.
Learn More
    
    
    



Twitch Prime    
    
    



Get free game content every month, exclusive discounts, plus loads more    
    
    



Get a member exclusive discount on new release and preorder boxed video games. You'll get characters, vehicles, skins, and boosts for top games on Twitch, plus surprises like full indie games and exclusive loot. You also receive ad-free viewing and a free monthly Twitch channel subscription to support your favorite streamer.
Learn more
    
    
    



All your photos, together at last    
    
    



Free unlimited photo storage    
    
    



Your Prime membership comes with free unlimited photo storage through Prime Photos, which lets you securely save as many photos as you like and see them on your phone, computer, or tablet. You can share this Prime benefit and give free photo storage to up to five family members or friends. Collect photos together with your invited family and friends in the Family Vault and store memories from everyone in one safe place. New photo search technology makes it easy to find specific photos by searching for things like “sunset” or “Seattle,” and your photos are organized automatically so it’s easy to find and enjoy them.
Learn more
    
    
    



Prime Rewards    
    
    



Cardmembers earn 5% Back with a Prime Credit Card.    
    
    



Eligible Prime members can earn 5% back at Amazon.com using the Amazon Prime Rewards Visa Card or the Amazon Prime Store card. All Prime members earn 2% rewards on their debit spending with Amazon Prime Reload.
Learn More

    
    
    



Get Early Access    
    
    



30-minute early access to select Amazon Lightning Deals    
    
    



Consider yourself a techy, the best-styled fashionista on the block, or just an everyday savvy shopper? Be among the first to decide what's hot and what's not. Get 30-minute early access to select Lightning Deals on Amazon.

Shop Amazon Lightning Deals

Look for Prime eligible items, videos, music and Kindle books are clearly marked. Just look for the Prime logo when you shop. 














  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Amazon   Investor Relations   Amazon Devices      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell Your Services on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Sell Your Apps on Amazon   Become an Affiliate   Advertise Your Products   Self-Publish with Us   Become an Amazon Vendor   Sell Your Subscription on Amazon   › See all      Amazon Payment Products   Amazon Rewards Visa Signature Cards   Amazon.com Store Card   Amazon.com Corporate Credit Line   Shop with Points   Credit Card Marketplace   Reload Your Balance   Amazon Currency Converter      Let Us Help You   Your Account   Your Orders   Shipping Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Assistant   Help                   English   United States          Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       Amazon Drive Cloud storagefrom Amazon       6pm Score dealson fashion brands       AbeBooks Books, art& collectibles       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Alexa Actionable Analyticsfor the Web       Amazon Business Everything ForYour Business          AmazonFresh Groceries & MoreRight To Your Door       AmazonGlobal Ship OrdersInternationally       Home Services Handpicked ProsHappiness Guarantee       Amazon Inspire Digital EducationalResources       Amazon Rapids Fun stories forkids on the go       Amazon Restaurants Food delivery fromlocal restaurants       Amazon Video Direct Video DistributionMade Easy          Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       AudiobookStand Discount Audiobookson Disc       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide       Box Office Mojo Find MovieBox Office Data       ComiXology Thousands ofDigital Comics       CreateSpace Indie Print PublishingMade Easy          DPReview DigitalPhotography       East Dane Designer Men'sFashion       Fabric Sewing, Quilting& Knitting       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       IMDbPro Get Info EntertainmentProfessionals Need       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Items       Prime Photos Unlimited Photo StorageFree With Prime       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       TenMarks.com Math Activitiesfor Kids & Schools       Warehouse Deals Open-BoxDiscounts       Whispercast Discover & DistributeDigital Content               Withoutabox Submit toFilm Festivals       Woot! Deals andShenanigans       Zappos Shoes &Clothing       Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Subscribe with Amazon Discover & trysubscription services               Conditions of Use   Privacy Notice   Interest-Based Ads   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    










v



































Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings








































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v




























william w harvey - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











William Harvey - William Harvey. Find Results.



Ad
 ·
Reference.com/​William Harvey



William Harvey. Find Results. See Reference.com Related Content.





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles





Harvey Records Free Search - Official Public Records



Ad
 ·
www.PublicRecordsOfficial.com/​Harvey



Official Source For Harvey Records. Search Now!





Background Checks



Public Records



Court Records




Criminal Records



Driving Records



Arrest Records





We Found William Harvey - See Current Address, Cell Phone.



Ad
 ·
SpyFly.com/​William harvey



See Current Address, Cell Phone. Email, and More. Search For Free.















William Harvey




William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known physician to describe completely

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia







Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

William Henry Harvey - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Willian_Henry_Harvey


William Henry Harvey, FRS FLS (5 February 1811 – 15 May 1866) was an Irish botanist and phycologist who specialised in algae.


William Harvey, Hampton University President, Reflects On ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/11/16/william-harvey-hampton...


There are few places in Hampton University President William Harvey’s life where he doesn’t enjoy the best view. From his multi-million dollar new ...


William Hope Harvey - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Coin_Harvey


"W.H. Harvey" redirects here. For the Irish botanist, see William Henry Harvey. For other people with the same name, see William Harvey (disambiguation). After ...


William Harvey and the Myth of Objective, Empirical ...

www.huffingtonpost.com/thomas-wright/william-harvey-biography_b...


Every schoolchild knows (or ought to know) that it was William Harvey who discovered the circulation of the blood in the early 1600s. The Englishman's th...


F. W. Harvey - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/F.W._Harvey


The Augustan Books of Modern Poetry: Frederick William Harvey. London: Ernest Benn. Forest Offering: A Selection from the Unpublished Poems of F.W. Harvey, 1888-1957.


W. E. Harvey - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/William_Edwin_Harvey


William Edwin Harvey (5 September 1852 – 28 April 1914), known as W. E. Harvey, was a British Lib-Lab Member of Parliament. Born in Hasland, Derbyshire, Harvey ...


William Harvey (artist) - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/William_Harvey_(artist)


William Harvey (13 July 1796 – 1866) was an English engraver and designer. Born at Newcastle upon Tyne, Harvey was the son of a bath-keeper. At the age of 14, he ...


William Harvey Articles, Photos and Videos - AOL

https://www.aol.com/news/tag/william+harvey


Browse our collection of william harvey information for news stories, slideshows, opinion pieces and related videos posted on AOL.com.


William Harvey (disambiguation) - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Bill_Harvey


William Harvey (1578–1657) was an English physician who made the first exact description of blood circulation. William Harvey may also refer to:


D. W. Harvey - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/D._W._Harvey


David William Harvey, B.A.Sc., M.E.I.C. (February 24, 1887-December 6, 1938) was a Canadian engineer and transportation manager. He was a key player in the early ...










William Harvey - William Harvey. Find Results.



Ad
 ·
Reference.com/​William Harvey



William Harvey. Find Results. See Reference.com Related Content.





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles





Harvey Records Free Search - Official Public Records



Ad
 ·
www.PublicRecordsOfficial.com/​Harvey



Official Source For Harvey Records. Search Now!





Background Checks



Public Records



Court Records




Criminal Records



Driving Records



Arrest Records





We Found William Harvey - See Current Address, Cell Phone.



Ad
 ·
SpyFly.com/​William harvey



See Current Address, Cell Phone. Email, and More. Search For Free.


12345Next
















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network














william w harvey - WOW.com - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation

















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images




Reference


Reference










William Harvey - Results on Looksmart.com | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​William Harvey



Now William Harvey Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





William Harvey - William Harvey | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​William Harvey



Find William Harvey and Related Articles. Search Now!





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles




Web Results

William W Harvey, father of 0 - Ancestry

https://www.ancestry.com/genealogy/records/william-w-harvey_129435613


Research genealogy for William W Harvey of Howard, Missouri, USA, as well as other members of the Harvey family, on Ancestry.


William W. Harvey (1855 - 1946) - Find A Grave Memorial

https://www.findagrave.com/cgi-bin/fg.cgi?page=gr&GSln=Harvey&...


William W. Harvey married Seba L. Stout Murphy on September 17, 1914 in Spokane, Washington and adopted her two children: Opal Lydia & Glen William Murphy. They also ...


William W Harvey - Spencer , IN - Company Information

https://www.dandb.com/businessdirectory/williamwharvey-spencer-in...


Find the William W Harvey business profile in Spencer ...


William W Harvey, 61 - Pierpont, OH | MyLife.com ...

https://www.mylife.com/william-harvey/e360334980942


View free background profile for William W Harvey on MyLife.com™ - Phone | 32*** **** N St Address, Pierpont, OH | 0 EMAILS | Photos | 3 Profiles | 1 Review & More


William W Harvey | Facebook

https://www.facebook.com/william.w.harvey.9


William W Harvey is on Facebook. Join Facebook to connect with William W Harvey and others you may know. Facebook gives people the power to share and...


William W. Harvey - Tributes.com

hanes-lineberry-edgefield.tributes.com/.../William-W.-Harvey-102152240


Obituary, funeral and service information for William W. Harvey from High Point, North Carolina. Funeral services by Hanes Lineberry Funeral Home.


William W Harvey: person, pictures and information - fold3.com

https://www.fold3.com/page/638352003_william_w_harvey


View William W Harvey's military memorial page on Fold3. Discover and add pictures, bio information and documents about the life of William W Harvey.


William W Harvey II | LinkedIn

https://www.linkedin.com/in/william-w-harvey-ii-17b4b41a


View William W Harvey II’S professional profile on LinkedIn. LinkedIn is the world's largest business network, helping professionals like William W Harvey II ...


William W Harvey - Russell, PA | Intelius

https://www.intelius.com/people/William-Harvey/Russell-PA/08BV1V39WDT


Get full contact details for William W Harvey in Russell, PA instantly. We found 5 addresses, 4 phone numbers, and 3 relatives and/or associates connected with this ...


William Harvey Obituary - Saint Louis, MO | St. Louis Post ...

www.legacy.com/obituaries/stltoday/obituary.aspx?pid=185601607


Harvey, William W. May 20, 2017. Visitation 8 am, Fri., May 26, followed by Mass, 8:30 am, St. John Bosco Catholic Church, 12934 Marine Ave. Interment Jefferson ...










William Harvey - Results on Looksmart.com | www1.looksmart.com



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​William Harvey



Now William Harvey Here. Get Great Results on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





William Harvey - William Harvey | reference.com



Ad
 ·
reference.com/​William Harvey



Find William Harvey and Related Articles. Search Now!





Browse Education



Browse Finance




Browse Health



Browse Vehicles



12345Next






Answers







William Harvey



William Harvey (1 April 1578 – 3 June 1657) was an English physician who made seminal contributions in anatomy and physiology. He was the first known...

more






W. E. Harvey



William Edwin Harvey (5 September 1852 – 28 April 1914), known as W. E. Harvey, was a British Lib-Lab Member of Parliament. Born in Hasland,...

more






William Harvey (artist)



William Harvey (13 July 1796 – 1866) was an English engraver and designer. Born at Newcastle upon Tyne, Harvey was the son of a bath-keeper. At the age...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | About our Ads
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Part of the AOL Search Network.








